Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-619
Appropriations and expenses; revision; power of first council.

If, at the beginning of the term of office of the first council elected under sections 19-601 to 19-648, the appropriations or distribution of the expenditures of the city government for the current fiscal year have been made, the council shall have power, by ordinance, to repeal or revise such distribution, or to make additional appropriations within the limit of the total taxes levied for the year.

Laws 1917, c. 208, § 20, p. 503;

C.S.1922, § 4557;

C.S.1929, § 19-620;

R.S.1943, § 19-619.